Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1602
Formation of bankers bank; requirements.

A bankers bank may be formed with the approval of the department and subject to requirements and procedures for the issuance of a new bank charter or the transfer of an existing bank charter as provided in the Nebraska Banking Act. A bankers bank shall be a bank which is:

(1) Insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(2) Owned substantially by other Nebraska banks, bank holding companies, foreign bank holding companies, or a combination of such entities; and

(3) Directly and through all its subsidiaries engaged exclusively in providing services for other banks and their officers, directors, and employees.

Laws 1986, LB 1123, § 2;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 72;

Laws 1999, LB 396, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 22.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.02.